Washington statutes.
RCW 18.96.040

Licensure board for landscape architects—Members—Qualifications.

(1)(a) There is created a licensure board for landscape architects consisting of five members appointed by the governor.

(b) Four members shall be licensed landscape architects who are residents of the state and have at least eight years' experience in the practice of landscape architecture as registered or licensed landscape architects in responsible charge of landscape architectural work or responsible charge of landscape architectural teaching. One member shall be a public member, who is not and has never been a registered or licensed landscape architect and who does not employ and is not employed by or professionally or financially associated with a landscape architect.

(c) The term of each newly appointed member shall be six years.

(2)(a) Every member of the board shall receive a certificate of appointment from the governor. On the expiration of the term of each member, the governor shall appoint a successor to serve for a term of six years or until the next successor has been appointed.

(b) The governor may remove any member of the board for cause. Vacancies in the board for any reason shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term.

(3) The board shall elect a chair, a vice chair, and a secretary. The secretary may delegate his or her authority to the executive director.

(4) Members of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2011 c 336 s 501; 2009 c 370 s 5; 1993 c 35 s 1; 1985 c 18 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 158 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 370 ss 1-16, 18, 20, and 21: See note following RCW 18.96.010.

Finding—2009 c 370: See note following RCW 18.96.010.

Effective date—1985 c 18: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect on June 30, 1985." [ 1985 c 18 s 6.]